Hawaii statutes.
[§481B-23]
Determining bad faith intent. (a) In any action brought pursuant to this
part, it shall be the claimant’s burden to prove by a preponderance of the
evidence the person’s bad faith intent. In determining whether there is bad
faith intent pursuant to section 481B-22, a court may consider factors,
including, but not limited to, the following:

(1) The trademark
or other intellectual property rights of the person, if any, in the domain
name;

(2) The person’s
prior use, if any, of the domain name in connection with the bona fide offering
of any goods or services;

(3) The person’s
bona fide noncommercial or fair use of the mark in a site accessible under the
domain name;

(4) The person’s
intent to divert users from the mark owner’s online location to a site
accessible under the domain name that could harm the goodwill represented by
the mark, either for commercial gain or to tarnish or disparage the mark, by
creating a likelihood of confusion as to the source, sponsorship, affiliation,
or endorsement of the site;

(5) The extent to
which the domain name consists of the legal name of the person or a name that
is otherwise commonly used to identify the person;

(6) The person’s
offer to transfer, sell, or otherwise assign the domain name for financial gain
without having used or having an intent to use, the domain name in the bona
fide offering of any goods or services or the person’s prior conduct indicating
a pattern of such conduct;

(7) The person’s
provision of material and misleading false contact information when applying
for the registration of the domain name, the person’s intentional failure to
maintain accurate contact information, or the person’s prior conduct indicating
a pattern of such conduct;

(8) The person’s
registration or acquisition of multiple domain names that the person knew were
identical or confusingly similar to marks of others that were distinctive at
the time of registration of the domain names, without regard to the goods or
services of the parties;

(9) The person’s
registration or acquisition of multiple domain names that the person knew were
identical or confusingly similar to the name of another living person, without
the person’s consent; and

(10) The person
sought or obtained consent from the rightful owner to register, traffic in, or
use the domain name.

(b) Bad
faith intent described in subsection (a) shall not be found in any case in
which the court determines that the person alleged to be in violation of this
part believed and had reasonable grounds to believe that the use of the domain
name was a fair use or otherwise lawful. [L 2001, c 281, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next